District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.53

Alternate methods of giving proof.

Proof of financial responsibility when required under this chapter, with respect to such a vehicle or with respect to a person who is not the owner of such a vehicle may be given by filing:

(1)

A certificate of insurance, as provided in § 50-1301.54 or 50-1301.55; or

(2)

A certificate of self-insurance, as provided in § 50-1301.79, supplemented by an agreement by the self-insurer that, with respect to accidents occurring while the certificate is in force, he will pay the same amounts that an insurer would have been obliged to pay under an owner’s motor vehicle liability policy if it had issued such a policy to said self-insurer.

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 133, ch. 222, § 53
Sept. 18, 1982, D.C. Law 4-155,§ 14(c)(3), 29 DCR 3491

History

1981 Ed., § 40-453.
1973 Ed., § 40-469.

Prior Codifications